District of Columbia statutes.
29-1006.02

Patron and investor members’ interests.

(a)

Unless the organic rules establish investor members’ interests, a member’s interest shall be a patron member’s interest.

(b)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, if a limited cooperative association has investor members, while a person is a member of the association, the person, if admitted as:

(1)

A patron member, shall remain a patron member;

(2)

An investor member, shall remain an investor member; and

(3)

A patron member and investor member, shall remain a patron and investor member if not dissociated in one of the capacities.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 602 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.